Hawaii, session 2026, HB2428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that reasonable limits on legislative service promote fresh perspectives, broaden opportunities for civic participation, and strengthen public confidence in representative government.  Establishing an aggregate limit on legislative service ensures a balance between institutional knowledge and responsiveness to the evolving needs of the public. The legislature further finds that proposals to establish legislative term limits have been introduced in prior legislative sessions but have not been enacted.  In recognition of the inherent challenges associated with asking currently serving legislators to vote on measures that would directly affect their own tenure, this Act is designed to apply prospectively. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a lifetime aggregate limit on service in the legislature that applies only to individuals who first assume legislative office in 2026 or thereafter, thereby relieving existing members of any immediate personal impact while ensuring that future legislative service is subject to reasonable and clearly defined limits. SECTION 2.  Article III of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "MAXIMUM LENGTH OF SERVICE Section .  No person shall serve more than twenty-four total years of legislative service in the legislature, whether such service is rendered in the house of representatives, the senate, or any combination thereof. No person shall be eligible to be elected or appointed to the house of representatives or senate if the term sought would cause the person's total years of legislative service to exceed twenty-four years. Service in either chamber shall be aggregated for purposes of calculating the total years of legislative service. Any partial term served by election or appointment shall be included in the calculation of total years of legislative service. This section shall not apply to the legislative terms for those legislators who were elected or appointed to serve in either house of the legislature on or prior to December 31, 2025.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to shorten or otherwise affect the term of any legislator who assumed office on or prior to December 31, 2025. For the purposes of this section: "Legislative service" means service as a member of the house of representatives or senate, whether by election or appointment. "Term of office" includes any partial term served by election or appointment. "Total years of legislative service" means the cumulative number of years served in either or both houses of the legislature." SECTION 3.  The question to be printed on the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall a person appointed or elected to the legislature after January 1, 2026, be limited to serving no more than twenty-four years as a member of the legislature, whether as a member of the house of representatives, a member of the senate, or any combination thereof, during the person's lifetime?" SECTION 4.  New constitutional material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This amendment shall take effect upon compliance with article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________